Hawaii statutes.
§76-28 Forms required of appointing
authorities. Each director shall develop and administer an employment
records management system and require appointing authorities to transmit such
records as the director may request. Appointing authorities shall maintain
records of all appointments, terminations of employment, transfers,
resignations, suspensions, demotions, and discharges, other employment records
and forms deemed appropriate by the director. [L 1955, c 274, pt of §1; RL
1955, §3-21(i); HRS §76-28; am L 1981, c 5, §1; am L 1994, c 56, §21; am L
1998, c 51, §1; am L 1999, c 18, §3; am L 2000, c 253, §20]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next